apertium-wal.wal.twol
Alphabet

 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z     ! CH DH NH NY PH SH TS ZH 
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z ' ’ ! ch dh nh ny ph sh ts zh cc
 %{tv%}:0 
 %{V%}:0
 %{‼%}:0  ! blocks phonology from applying, so that we can have exceptions

 ;

Sets

Vow = A E I O U
      a e i o u ;

Cns = B C D F G H J K L M N P Q R S T V W X Y Z       ! CH DH NH NY PH SH TS ZH 
      b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x y z ' ’ ; ! ch dh nh ny ph sh ts zh ' ;

Rules

! You need a default rule to make it compile
"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

!"{e} to y after vowel"
!%{e%}:y <=> :Vow :0* _ ;

!"change cc to ccsh"
!%{iss%}:sh <=> :cc :0* _ ;

!"change c to j"
!d:XXX =>i_:;


"change {V} to next vowel"
%{V%}:Vy <=> _ :0* :Vy ;
         except
             _ :0* :Vy :Vow ;
         where Vy in Vow ;

"degeminate consonant before -iss"
Cx:0 <=> _ :Cx :0* :i :s :s ;
     except
         _ :Cx %{‼%}: ;
         _ :c ;  ! avoid conflict with cc > sh
     where Cx in Cns ;

!! another way to write the above environment is like this:
!!Cx:0 <=> _ :Cx [ :0 - %{‼%}: ]* :i :s :s ;

"first c>s when cc > sh before -iss"
c:s <=> _ c: :0* :i :s :s ;
    except
        _ c:0 ;  ! avoid conflict with degemination, etc.

"second c>h when cc > sh before -iss"
c:h <=> c: _ :0* :i :s :s ;

"delete k before -iss in ak-"
k:0 <=> .#. :a _ :0* :i :s :s ;
! if a new word, e.g. xak- also deletes, add something like this
!        .#. :x :a _ :0* :i :s :s ;


!"insert h to make sh"
!%{h%}:h <=> :s _ ;

!"don't insert h to make sh"
!%{h%}:0 <=> :t _ ;


!cc + iss → shiss
!CnsCns + iss → Cnsiss Exceptions: 7azall, harumm, Cimm
!ak + iss → aiss
!CnsCns + ett → Cnsett Exceptions: onakk
!kacc + ett → kashett
!medd + ett → merett
!shaakk + ett →shaahett 
!ott + ett → ashett



! Resources:
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! http://hfst.sourceforge.net/
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
                                                                                               
